Louisiana, session 2026, SB36.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:636(7) and 1158 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§636. Other prohibited acts
The following acts and the causing thereof are prohibited:
* * *
(7) The use of food as a delivery mechanism for an mRNA vaccine.
* * *
§1158. Informed consent for vaccinations
A. Prior to any healthcare provider administering a vaccine to a patient,
the provider shall provide the patient with the following information:
(1) The vaccine information statement required by federal law pursuant
to 42 U.S.C. 300aa-26.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-92 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 36
(2) The state required vaccine written consent form created by the
surgeon general that shall include all of the following:
(a) The specific vaccine being administered.
(b) The specific disease or diseases that the vaccine is intended to prevent
or reduce the adverse health effects of.
(c) The vaccine technology used to develop the vaccine.
(d) The benefits to the patient if the vaccine is administered.
(e) The short-term and long-term risks to the patient if the vaccine is
administered.
B. A person shall not be considered capable of providing informed
consent for a vaccination under any of the following conditions:
(1) Within forty-eight hours prior to a planned medical procedure which
requires the administration of anesthesia or within forty-eight hours after
anesthesia is administered to the patient.
(2) Within twelve hours of childbirth.
(3) Within twenty-four hours after a narcotic medication has been
administered to the patient.
C. The patient informed consent for vaccinations provided for in this
Section shall be in addition to any informed consent to medical treatment
required by R.S. 40:1157.1 et seq.